Illinois, session 104th, SB3820.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Industrial Hemp Act is amended by changing 5Sections 5, 15, and 20 as follows: 6    (505 ILCS 89/5)7    Sec. 5. Definitions. In this Act:8    "Department" means the Department of Agriculture.9    "Director" means the Director of Agriculture.10    "Hemp" has the meaning given to that term in 7 U.S.C. 111639o. or "industrial hemp" means the plant Cannabis sativa L. 12and any part of that plant, whether growing or not, with a 13delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of not more than 140.3 percent on a dry weight basis and includes any 15intermediate or finished product made or derived from 16industrial hemp. 17    "Hemp-derived cannabinoid product" has the meaning given 18to that term in 7 U.S.C. 1639o.19    "Hemp production plan" means a plan submitted by the 20Department to the Secretary of the United States Department of 21Agriculture pursuant to 7 U.S.C. 1639p the federal Agriculture 22Improvement Act of 2018, Public Law 115-334, and consistent 23with the Domestic Hemp Production Program pursuant to 7 CFR   SB3820- 2 -LRB104 20131 BDA 33582 b1Part 990 or successor regulations wherein the Department 2establishes its desire to have primary regulatory authority 3over the production of hemp. 4    "Industrial hemp" has the meaning given to that term in 7 5U.S.C. 1639o.6    "Land area" means a farm as defined in Section 1-60 of the 7Property Tax Code in this State or land or facilities under the 8control of an institution of higher education.9    "Person" means any individual, partnership, firm, 10corporation, company, society, association, the State or any 11department, agency, or subdivision thereof, or any other 12entity.13    "Process" means the conversion of raw industrial hemp 14plant material into a form that is presently legal to import 15from outside the United States under federal law.16    "THC" means any delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol.17(Source: P.A. 102-690, eff. 12-17-21.) 18    (505 ILCS 89/15)19    Sec. 15. Rules. 20    (a) The Department shall submit to the Secretary of the 21United States Department of Agriculture a hemp production plan 22under which the Department monitors and regulates the 23production of industrial hemp in this State. The Department 24shall adopt rules incorporating the hemp production plan, 25including application and licensing requirements.  SB3820- 3 -LRB104 20131 BDA 33582 b1    (b) The rules set by the Department shall include one 2yearly inspection of a licensed industrial hemp cultivation 3operation and allow for additional unannounced inspections of 4a licensed industrial hemp cultivation operation at the 5Department's discretion.6    (c) The Department shall adopt rules necessary for the 7administration and enforcement of this Act in accordance with 8all applicable State and federal laws and regulations, 9including rules concerning standards and criteria for 10licensure and registration, for the payment of applicable 11fees, signage, and for forms required for the administration 12of this Act.13    (d) The Department shall adopt rules for the testing of 14the industrial hemp THC levels and the disposal of plant 15matter exceeding lawful THC levels, including an option for a 16cultivator to retest for a minor violation, with the retest 17threshold determined by the Department and set in rule. Those 18rules may provide for the use of seed certified to meet the THC 19levels mandated by this Act as an alternative to testing. 20    (e) Within 12 months of the effective date of this 21amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the Department 22shall adopt rules consistent with the changes in federal law 23with respect to hemp and industrial hemp reflected in the 24federal Continuing Appropriations, Agriculture, Legislative 25Branch, Military Construction and Veterans Affairs, and 26Extensions Act, 2026 (Public Law 119-37).   SB3820- 4 -LRB104 20131 BDA 33582 b1(Source: P.A. 102-690, eff. 12-17-21.) 2    (505 ILCS 89/20)3    Sec. 20. Hemp products. Nothing in this Act shall alter 4the legality of hemp or hemp products or hemp-derived 5cannabinoid products that are presently legal to possess or 6own.7(Source: P.A. 100-1091, eff. 8-26-18.) 8    Section 10. The Cannabis Control Act is amended by 9changing Section 15.2 as follows: 10    (720 ILCS 550/15.2)11    Sec. 15.2. Industrial hemp pilot program.12    (a) Pursuant to Section 7606 of the federal Agricultural 13Act of 2014, an institution of higher education or the 14Department of Agriculture may grow or cultivate industrial 15hemp if:16        (1) the industrial hemp is grown or cultivated for 17    purposes of research conducted under an agricultural pilot 18    program or other agricultural or academic research;19        (2) the pilot program studies the growth, cultivation, 20    or marketing of industrial hemp; and21        (3) any site used for the growing or cultivating of 22    industrial hemp is certified by, and registered with, the 23    Department of Agriculture.  SB3820- 5 -LRB104 20131 BDA 33582 b1    (b) Before conducting industrial hemp research, an 2institution of higher education shall notify the Department of 3Agriculture and any local law enforcement agency in writing.4    (c) The institution of higher education shall provide 5quarterly reports and an annual report to the Department of 6Agriculture on the research and the research program shall be 7subject to random inspection by the Department of Agriculture, 8the Illinois State Police, or local law enforcement agencies. 9The institution of higher education shall submit the annual 10report to the Department of Agriculture on or before October 111.12    (d) The Department of Agriculture may adopt rules to 13implement this Section. In order to provide for the 14expeditious and timely implementation of this Section, upon 15notification by an institution of higher education that the 16institution wishes to engage in the growth or cultivation of 17industrial hemp for agricultural research purposes, the 18Department of Agriculture may adopt emergency rules under 19Section 5-45 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act to 20implement the provisions of this Section. If changes to the 21rules are required to comply with federal rules, the 22Department of Agriculture may adopt peremptory rules as 23necessary to comply with changes to corresponding federal 24rules. All other rules that the Department of Agriculture 25deems necessary to adopt in connection with this Section must 26proceed through the ordinary rule-making process. The adoption   SB3820- 6 -LRB104 20131 BDA 33582 b1of emergency rules authorized by this Section shall be deemed 2to be necessary for the public interest, safety, and welfare. 3    The Department of Agriculture may determine, by rule, the 4duration of an institution of higher education's pilot program 5or industrial hemp research. If the institution of higher 6education has not completed its program within the timeframe 7established by rule, then the Department of Agriculture may 8grant an extension to the pilot program if unanticipated 9circumstances arose that impacted the program. 10    Within 12 months of the effective date of this amendatory 11Act of the 104th General Assembly, the Department of 12Agriculture shall adopt rules consistent with the changes in 13federal law with respect to hemp and industrial hemp reflected 14in the federal Continuing Appropriations, Agriculture, 15Legislative Branch, Military Construction and Veterans 16Affairs, and Extensions Act, 2026 (Public Law 119-37).17    (e) As used in this Section:18    "Industrial hemp" has the meaning given to that term in 7 19U.S.C. 1639o means cannabis sativa L. having no more than 0.3% 20total THC available, upon heating, or maximum delta-9 21tetrahydrocannabinol content possible. 22    "Institution of higher education" means a State 23institution of higher education that offers a 4-year degree in 24agricultural science.25(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 26    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon   SB3820- 7 -LRB104 20131 BDA 33582 b1becoming law.